Utah statutes.
59-7-509.   Failure to file return -- Penalty.
In case of any failure to make and file a return required by this chapter
within the time prescribed by law or prescribed by the commission in pursuance
of law, there shall be added to the amount required to be shown as tax on the
return a penalty as provided in Section 59-1-401. The amounts so added to any
tax shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner and as a part
of the tax, unless the tax has been paid before the discovery of the neglect,
in which case the amount so added shall be collected in the same manner as the
tax.
